Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2745.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 297G.09, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Monthly returns; manufacturers, wholesalers, brewers, or importers. On or before the 18th day of each calendar month following the month in which a licensed manufacturer or wholesaler first sells wine and distilled spirits within the state, or a brewer or importer first sells or imports fermented malt beverages, or a wholesaler knowingly acquires title to or possession of untaxed fermented malt beverages, the licensed manufacturer, wholesaler, brewer, or importer liable for the excise tax must file a return with the commissioner, and in addition must keep records and render reports as required by the commissioner. The commissioner shall prescribe the content, format, and manner of returns pursuant to section 270C.30. The returns must contain any other information required by the commissioner. Returns must be accompanied by a remittance for the full unpaid tax liability. Returns must be filed regardless of whether a tax is duenew text begin , except that qualified brewers, as defined in section 297G.04, subdivision 2, do not need to file when no tax is duenew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for returns required to be filed by July 18, 2025, and thereafter. new text end